src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronoun inflection
! ----------------------
!! The Võro language pronouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but with a colon (':') as separator.

LEXICON PronounTypes
!Personal ;
Interrogative ;
!Relative ;
Demonstrative ;
!Reflexive ;
!Reciprocal ;
!Indefinite ;
määnegi+A+Indef:mään A_MAANEGI ;
määne+A+Interr:mä A_MAANE ;
sääne+A:sä A_MAANE ;

LEXICON A_MAANE ! määne:mä
+Sg+Nom:äne K ;
+Sg+Gen:äntse K ;
+Sg+Par:änest K ;
+Sg+Ill:äntsehe K ;
+Sg+Ine:äntsen K ;
+Err/Dial+Sg+Ine:äntseh K ;
+Err/Dial+Sg+Ine:äntsehn K ;
+Sg+Ela:äntsest K ;
+Sg+All:äntsele K ;
+Sg+Ade:äntsel K ;
+Sg+Abl:äntselt K ;
+Sg+All:äntsele K ;
+Sg+Tra:äntses K ;
+Sg+Ter:äntseniq K ;
+Sg+Abe:äntseldäq K ;
+Sg+Com:äntsegaq K ;

+Pl+Nom:äntseq K ;
+Err/Orth+Pl+Nom:ntseq K ;
+Err/Orth+Pl+Nom:ändseq K ;
+Pl+Gen:äntside K ;
+Pl+Par:äntsit K ;
+Pl+Ill:äntsihe K ;
+Pl+Ine:äntsin K ;
+Err/Dial+Pl+Ine:äntsih K ;
+Err/Dial+Pl+Ine:äntsihn K ;
+Pl+Ela:äntsist K ;
+Pl+All:äntsile K ;
+Pl+Ade:äntsil K ;
+Pl+Abl:äntsilt K ;
+Pl+All:äntsile K ;
+Pl+Tra:äntsis K ;
+Pl+Ter:äntsiniq K ;
+Pl+Abe:äntsildäq K ;
+Pl+Com:äntsidegaq K ;

LEXICON A_MAANEGI
+Sg+Nom:egi K ;
+Sg+Gen:tsegi K ;
+Sg+Par:estki K ;
+Sg+Ill:tsehegi K ;
+Sg+Ine:tsengi K ;
+Err/Dial+Sg+Ine:tsehki K ;
+Err/Dial+Sg+Ine:tsehngi K ;
+Sg+Ela:tsestki K ;
+Sg+All:tselegi K ;
+Sg+Ade:tselgi K ;
+Sg+Abl:tseltki K ;
+Sg+All:tselegi K ;
+Sg+Tra:tseski K ;
+Sg+Ter:tseniqki K ;
+Sg+Abe:tseldäqki K ;
+Sg+Com:tsegaqki K ;

+Pl+Nom:tseqki K ;
+Pl+Gen:tsidegi K ;
+Pl+Par:tsitki K ;
+Pl+Ill:tsihegi K ;
+Pl+Ine:tsingi K ;
+Err/Dial+Pl+Ine:tsihki K ;
+Err/Dial+Pl+Ine:tsihngi K ;
+Pl+Ela:tsistki K ;
+Pl+All:tsilegi K ;
+Pl+Ade:tsilgi K ;
+Pl+Abl:tsiltki K ;
+Pl+All:tsilegi K ;
+Pl+Tra:tsiski K ;
+Pl+Ter:tsiniqki K ;
+Pl+Abe:tsildäqki K ;
+Pl+Com:tsidegaqki K ;

!! ### PERSONAL PRONOUN
LEXICON PERS-SG1
PERS_PL1 ;
+Pers+Sg1: PERS-SG1-2-NOM-COM ;
+Pers+Sg1:u PERS-SG1-2-ABE-TRA ;
+Pers+Sg1:ino PERS-SG1-2-ABE-TRA ;

LEXICON PERS-SG2
PERS_PL2 ;
+Pers+Sg2:s PERS-SG1-2-NOM-COM ;
+Pers+Sg2:su PERS-SG1-2-ABE-TRA ;
+Pers+Sg2:sino PERS-SG1-2-ABE-TRA ;

LEXICON PERS-SG3
!PERS_PL3 ;
+Pers+Sg3+Nom: FOR-PERS-SG3-GEN/NOM ;
+Pers+Sg3+Gen: FOR-PERS-SG3-GEN/NOM ;
+Pers+Sg3+Abe:imäldäq FRONT_K ;
+Pers+Sg3+Abe:imälda K ; !! CHECKME vowel harmony
+Pers+Sg3+Com:imägaq K ;
+Err/Orth+Pers+Sg3+Com:imäga K ;
+Pers+Sg3+Ill:immä K ;
+Pers+Sg3+Par:edä K ;
+Pers+Sg3+Par:immä K ;
+Pers+Sg3+Ade:äl K ;
+Pers+Sg3+All:älle K ;
+Pers+Sg3+All:ääle K ;
+Pers+Sg3+All:imäle K ;
+Pers+Sg3+Ter:imäiq K ;

+Pers+Sg3:ä PERS-SG1-2-ABE-TRA ;
+Pers+Sg3:ää PERS-SG1-2-ABE-TRA ;
+Pers+Sg3:imä PERS-SG1-2-ABE-TRA ;

LEXICON FOR-PERS-SG3-GEN/NOM
:ä K ;
+Err/Orth-est:a K ;
:ää K ;
:imä K ;
:iä K ;


LEXICON PERS-SG1-2-NOM-COM
+Nom:aq K ;
+Nom+Err/Orth-no-q:a K ;
+Nom:ina K ;
+Gen:uq K ;
+Gen+Err/Orth-no-q:u K ;
+Gen:ino K ;
+Par:inno K ;
+Par:innu K ;
+All:ullõ K ;
+All:inolõ K ;
+Ade:ul K ;
+Ade:inol K ;
+Ter:oniq K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Ter:oni K ;
+Com:uqkaq K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Com:uqka K ;
+Com:inogaq K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Com:inoga K ;

LEXICON PERS-SG1-2-ABE-TRA
NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ABESUF ;
NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ABLSUF ;
NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ADESUF ;
NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ELASUF ;
NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_TRASUF ;
+Ill:htõ K ;
NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_INESUF_N-H-HN ;


LEXICON PERS_PL1 !!= @CODE@ maq:m
+Pers+Pl1: PERS_PL1-2 ;

LEXICON PERS_PL2 !!= @CODE@ saq:
+Pers+Pl2:t PERS_PL1-2 ;

LEXICON PERS_PL3 !!= @CODE@ timä:
+Pers+Pl3+Nom:ääq K ;
+Pers+Pl3+Nom:ä K ;
+Pers+Pl3+Nom:imäq K ;
+Pers+Pl3+Nom:iäq K ;
+Pers+Pl3+Gen:äide K ;
+Pers+Pl3:äide%{front%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_TERSUF ;
+Pers+Pl3:ä FOR-PERS_PL1/2/3 ;


LEXICON PERS_PL1-2
+Nom:iiq K ;
+Nom:i K ;
+Gen:iiq K ;
+Gen:i K ;
+Com:iiqkaq K ;
:e FOR-PERS_PL1/2/3 ;

LEXICON FOR-PERS_PL1/2/3
+Par:id K ;
+Ela:ist K ;
+All:ile K ;
+Ade:il K ;
+Abl:ilt K ;
+Tra:is K ;
+Abe:ildäq K ;
+Ill:ihte K ;
+Ine:in K ;
+Ine:ih K ;
+Ine:ihn K ;


!! ### DEMONSTRATIVE PRONOUNS
LEXICON Demonstrative
seo+Pron+Dem: DEM-SEO ;
taa+Pron+Dem: DEM-TAA ;
tuu+Pron+Dem: DEM-TUU ;

LEXICON DEM-SEO
+Sg+Nom:seo K ;
+Sg+Nom:śoo K ;!FIXME need tag for preference
+Sg+Gen:seo K ;
+Sg+Gen:śoo K ;!
+Sg+Par:seod K ;
+Sg+Par:śood K ;
+Sg+Ill:seoho K ;
+Sg+Ill:śooho K ;
+Sg:seo%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_INESUF_N-H-HN ;
+Sg:śoo%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_INESUF_N-H-HN ;
+Sg:seo%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ELASUF ;
+Sg:śoo%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ELASUF ;
+Sg:seo%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ALLSUF_lE ;
+Sg:śoo%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ALLSUF_lE ;
+Sg:seo NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ADESUF ;
+Sg:śoo NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ADESUF ;
+Sg+All:śollõ K ;
+Sg:seo NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ABLSUF ;
+Sg:śoo NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ABLSUF ;
+Sg+Tra:seos K ;
+Sg+Tra:śoos K ;
+Sg:seo%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_TERSUF ;
+Sg:śoo%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_TERSUF ;
+Sg:seo NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ABESUF ;
+Sg:śoo NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ABESUF ;
+Sg:seo NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_COMSUF_gaq ;
+Sg:śoo NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_COMSUF_gaq ;

+Pl+Nom:neoq K ;
+Pl+Nom:ńooq K ;
+Pl+Gen:neide K ;
+Pl+Par:neid K ;
+Pl+Ill:neihte K ;
+Pl:nei%{front%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_INESUF_N-H-HN ;
+Pl:nei%{front%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ELASUF ;
+Pl:nei%{front%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ALLSUF_lE ;
+Pl:nei NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ADESUF ;
+Pl:nei NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ABLSUF ;
+Pl+Tra:neis K ;
+Pl:neide%{front%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_TERSUF ;
+Pl:nei NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ABESUF ;
+Pl:nei NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_COMSUF_gaq ;


LEXICON DEM-TAA
+Sg+Nom:taa K ;
+Sg+Gen:taa K ;
+Sg+Par:taad K ;
+Sg+Ill:taaha K ;
+Sg:taa%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_INESUF_N-H-HN ;
+Sg:taa%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ELASUF ;
+Sg:taa%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ALLSUF_lE ;
+Sg:taa NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ADESUF ;
+Sg:taa NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ABLSUF ;
+Sg+Tra:taas K ;
+Sg:taa%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_TERSUF ;
+Sg:taa NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ABESUF ;
+Sg:taa NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_COMSUF_gaq ;

+Pl+Nom:naaq K ;
+Pl+Gen:naidõ K ;
+Pl+Par:naid K ;
+Pl+Ill:naihtõ K ;
+Pl:nai%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_INESUF_N-H-HN ;
+Pl:nai%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ELASUF ;
+Pl:nai%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ALLSUF_lE ;
+Pl:nai NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ADESUF ;
+Pl:nai NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ABLSUF ;
+Pl+Tra:nais K ;
+Pl:naidõ%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_TERSUF ;
+Pl:nai NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ABESUF ;
+Pl:naidõ NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_COMSUF_gaq ;

LEXICON DEM-TUU
+Sg+Nom:tuu K ;
+Sg+Gen:tuu K ;
+Sg+Par:tuud K ;
+Sg+Ill:tuuhu K ;
+Sg:tuu%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_INESUF_N-H-HN ;
+Sg:tuu%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ELASUF ;
+Sg:too%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ALLSUF_lE ;
+Sg:tuu%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ADESUF ;
+Sg:tuu%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ABLSUF ;
+Sg+Tra:tuus K ;
+Sg:too%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_TERSUF ;
+Sg:too%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ABESUF ;
+Sg:tuu NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_COMSUF_gaq ;

+Pl+Nom:nuuq K ;
+Pl+Err/Orth-no-q+Nom:nuu K ;
+Pl+Gen:noidõ K ;
+Pl+Par:noid K ;
+Pl+Ill:noihtõ K ;
+Pl:noi%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_INESUF_N-H-HN ;
+Pl:noi%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ELASUF ;
+Pl:noi%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ALLSUF_lE ;
+Pl:noi NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ADESUF ;
+Pl:noi NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ABLSUF ;
+Pl+Tra:nois K ;
+Pl:noidõ%{back%} NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_TERSUF ;
+Pl:noi NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_ABESUF ;
+Pl:noidõ NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_COMSUF_gaq ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%{XV%} K ;


!! ### INDEFINITE PRONOUNS
!LEXICON PRON-INDEF_mis

LEXICON PRON_PALL1O
: Harm_Neutr_SG_NOM ;
:%{back%} Harm_Neutr_SG_GEN ;
:%{back%} Harm_Neutr_SG_ALL_lE-STEM ;
:%{back%} Harm_Neutr_SG_PAR_d ;

:%{back%} Harm_Neutr_PL_NOM ;
:%{back%} Harm_Neutr_PL_GEN_dE ;
:%{back%}d%{eõ%} PL_ALL_lE-STEM ;
